Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 1
DISCLOSURE OF AVERAGE CHARGE

6-20-101. Provider disclosure of average charge.

Each hospital licensed or certified pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a), C.R.S., shall disclose to a person seeking care or treatment his or her right to receive notice of the average facility charge for such treatment that is a frequently performed inpatient procedure prior to admission for such procedure; except that care or treatment for an emergency need not be disclosed prior to such emergency care or treatment. When requested, the average charge information shall be made available to the person prior to admission for such procedure.

Other health facilities licensed or certified pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a), C.R.S., shall disclose to a person seeking care or treatment his or her right to receive notice of the average facility charge for such treatment that is a frequently performed procedure prior to ordering or scheduling such procedure; except that care or treatment for an emergency need not be disclosed prior to such emergency care or treatment. When requested, such average charge information shall be made available to the person prior to the scheduling of the procedure.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1221, § 2, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1189, § 11, effective August 4.